New Jersey, session 222, A4190.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Section 11 of P.L.2017, c.341 (C.24:21-15.2) is amended to read as follows: 11.  a.  A practitioner shall not issue an initial prescription for an opioid drug which is a prescription drug as defined in section 2 of P.L.2003, c.280 (C.45:14-41) in a quantity exceeding a five-day supply for treatment of acute pain.  Any prescription for acute pain pursuant to this subsection shall be for the lowest effective dose of immediate-release opioid drug. b.    Prior to issuing an initial prescription of a Schedule II controlled dangerous substance or any other opioid drug which is a prescription drug as defined in section 2 of P.L.2003, c.280 (C.45:14-41) in a course of treatment for acute or chronic pain, a practitioner shall: (1)   take and document the results of a thorough medical history, including the patient's experience with non-opioid medication and non-pharmacological pain management approaches and substance abuse history; (2)   conduct, as appropriate, and document the results of a physical examination; (3)   develop a treatment plan, with particular attention focused on determining the cause of the patient's pain; (4)   access relevant prescription monitoring information under the Prescription Monitoring Program pursuant to section 8 of P.L.2015, c.74 (C. 45:1-46.1); and (5)   limit the supply of any opioid drug prescribed for acute pain to a duration of no more than five days as determined by the directed dosage and frequency of dosage. c.     No less than four days after issuing the initial prescription pursuant to subsection a. of this subsection, the practitioner, after consultation with the patient, may issue a subsequent prescription for the drug to the patient in any quantity that complies with applicable State and federal laws, provided that: (1)   the subsequent prescription would not be deemed an initial prescription under this section; (2)   the practitioner determines the prescription is necessary and appropriate to the patient's treatment needs and documents the rationale for the issuance of the subsequent prescription; and (3)   the practitioner determines that issuance of the subsequent prescription does not present an undue risk of abuse, addiction, or diversion and documents that determination. d.    Prior to issuing the initial prescription of a Schedule II controlled dangerous substance or any other opioid drug which is a prescription drug as defined in section 2 of P.L.2003, c.280 (C.45:14-41) in a course of treatment for acute pain and prior to issuing a prescription at the outset of a course of treatment for chronic pain, a practitioner shall discuss with the patient, or the patient's parent or guardian if the patient is under 18 years of age and is not an emancipated minor, the risks associated with the drugs being prescribed, including but not limited to: (1)   the risks of addiction and overdose associated with opioid drugs and the dangers of taking opioid drugs with alcohol, benzodiazepines and other central nervous system depressants; (2)   the reasons why the prescription is necessary; (3)   alternative treatments that may be available; and (4)   risks associated with the use of the drugs being prescribed, specifically that opioids are highly addictive, even when taken as prescribed, that there is a risk of developing a physical or psychological dependence on the controlled dangerous substance, and that the risks of taking more opioids than prescribed, or mixing sedatives, benzodiazepines or alcohol with opioids, can result in fatal respiratory depression. The practitioner shall include a note in the patient's medical record that the patient or the patient's parent or guardian, as applicable, has discussed with the practitioner the risks of developing a physical or psychological dependence on the controlled dangerous substance and alternative treatments that may be available.  The Division of Consumer Affairs shall develop and make available to practitioners guidelines for the discussion required pursuant to this subsection. e.     Prior to the commencement of an ongoing course of treatment for chronic pain with a Schedule II controlled dangerous substance or any opioid, the practitioner shall enter into a pain management agreement with the patient. f.     When a Schedule II controlled dangerous substance or any other prescription opioid drug is continuously prescribed for three months or more for chronic pain, the practitioner shall: (1)   review, at a minimum of every three months, the course of treatment, any new information about the etiology of the pain, and the patient's progress toward treatment objectives and document the results of that review; (2)   assess the patient prior to every renewal to determine whether the patient is experiencing problems associated with physical and psychological dependence and document the results of that assessment; (3)   periodically make reasonable efforts, unless clinically contraindicated, to either stop the use of the controlled substance, decrease the dosage, try other drugs or treatment modalities in an effort to reduce the potential for abuse or the development of physical or psychological dependence and document with specificity the efforts undertaken; (4)   review the Prescription Drug Monitoring information in accordance with section 8 of P.L.2015, c.74 (C. 45:1-46.1); [and] (5)   monitor compliance with the pain management agreement and any recommendations that the patient seek a referral; (6)   conduct baseline urine drug testing to establish a general assessment for new patients, monitor adherence to existing patient treatment plans, and to detect the use of non-prescribed drugs; (7)   conduct random urine screens at least once every 12 months; (8)   advise the patient, or the patient's parent or guardian if the patient is under 18 years of age and is not an emancipated minor, of the availability of an opioid antidote; and (9)   refer the patient to a pain management or addiction specialist for independent evaluation or treatment in order to achieve treatment objectives, if those objectives are not being met. g.    As used in this section: "Acute pain" means pain, whether resulting from disease, accidental or intentional trauma, or other cause, that the practitioner reasonably expects to last only a short period of time.  "Acute pain" does not include chronic pain, pain being treated as part of cancer care, hospice or other end of life care, or pain being treated as part of palliative care. Baseline urine testing means an initial patient assessment through urine drug testing to: (1) identify the presence of illicit substances prior to prescribing medication; or (2) confirm the presence or absence of a prescribed drug or drug class. "Chronic pain" means pain that persists [or recurs] for [more than] three or more consecutive months, and which continues, either continuously or episodically, after reasonable medical efforts have been made to relieve the pain or its cause. "Initial prescription" means a prescription issued to a patient who: (1)   has never previously been issued a prescription for the drug or its pharmaceutical equivalent; or (2)   was previously issued a prescription for, or used or was administered the drug or its pharmaceutical equivalent, but the date on which the current prescription is being issued is more than one year after the date the patient last used or was administered the drug or its equivalent. When determining whether a patient was previously issued a prescription for, or used or was administered a drug or its pharmaceutical equivalent, the practitioner shall consult with the patient and review the patient's medical record and prescription monitoring information. "Pain management agreement" means a written contract or agreement that is executed between a practitioner and a patient, prior to the commencement of treatment for chronic pain using a Schedule II controlled dangerous substance or any other opioid drug which is a prescription drug as defined in section 2 of P.L.2003, c.280 (C.45:14-41), as a means to: (1)   prevent the possible development of physical or psychological dependence in the patient; (2)   document the understanding of both the practitioner and the patient regarding the patient's pain management plan; (3)   establish the patient's rights in association with treatment, and the patient's obligations in relation to the responsible use, discontinuation of use, and storage of Schedule II controlled dangerous substances, including any restrictions on the refill of prescriptions or the acceptance of Schedule II prescriptions from practitioners; (4)   identify the specific medications and other modes of treatment, including physical therapy or exercise, relaxation, or psychological counseling, that are included as a part of the pain management plan; (5)   specify the measures the practitioner may employ to monitor the patient's compliance, including but not limited to random specimen screens and pill counts; and (6)   delineate the process for terminating the agreement, including the consequences if the practitioner has reason to believe that the patient is not complying with the terms of the agreement. "Practitioner" means a medical doctor, doctor of osteopathy, dentist, optometrist, podiatrist, physician assistant, certified nurse midwife, or advanced practice nurse, acting within the scope of practice of their professional license pursuant to Title 45 of the Revised Statutes. h.    This section shall not apply to a prescription for a patient who is currently in active treatment for cancer, receiving hospice care from a licensed hospice or palliative care, or is a resident of a long term care facility, or to any medications that are being prescribed for use in the treatment of substance abuse or opioid dependence. i.     Every policy, contract or plan delivered, issued, executed or renewed in this State, or approved for issuance or renewal in this State by the Commissioner of Banking and Insurance, and every contract purchased by the School Employees' Health Benefits Commission or State Health Benefits Commission, on or after the effective date of this act, that provides coverage for prescription drugs subject to a co-payment, coinsurance or deductible shall charge a co-payment, coinsurance or deductible for an initial prescription of an opioid drug prescribed pursuant to this section that is either: (1)   proportional between the cost sharing for a 30-day supply and the amount of drugs the patient was prescribed; or (2)   equivalent to the cost sharing for a full 30-day supply of the opioid drug, provided that no additional cost sharing may be charged for any additional prescriptions for the remainder of the 30-day supply. j.     A practitioner may prescribe the use of an implantable infusion pump that is utilized to achieve pain management for patients suffering from cancer, intractable pain, or terminal illness. A prescription for an implantable infusion pump may provide up to a 90-day supply. (cf: P.L.2017, c.341, s.11) 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.